test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-3lex_almos_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - čavos: # MLO, ok; this is an adjective
    čavos+N+Sg+Nom: čavos
    čavos+N+Sg+Gen: čappoos
    čavos+N+Sg+Acc: čappoos
    čavos+N+Sg+Ill: čaposân
    čavos+N+Sg+Loc: čaposist
    čavos+N+Sg+Com: čaposáin
    čavos+N+Sg+Abe: čappoosttáá
    čavos+N+Ess: [čaposin, čavosin]
    čavos+N+Par: [čaposid, čavosid]
    čavos+N+Pl+Nom: čaposeh
    čavos+N+Pl+Gen: čaposij
    čavos+N+Pl+Acc: čaposijd
    čavos+N+Pl+Ill: čaposáid
    čavos+N+Pl+Loc: čaposijn
    čavos+N+Pl+Com: čaposijguin
    čavos+N+Pl+Abe: čaposijttáá

  Noun - sajos: # MLO, ok
    sajos+N+Sg+Nom: sajos
    sajos+N+Sg+Gen: saijoos
    sajos+N+Sg+Acc: saijoos
    sajos+N+Sg+Ill: sajosân
    sajos+N+Sg+Loc: sajosist
    sajos+N+Sg+Com: sajosáin
    sajos+N+Sg+Abe: saijoosttáá
    sajos+N+Ess: sajosin
    sajos+N+Par: sajosid
    sajos+N+Pl+Nom: sajoseh
    sajos+N+Pl+Gen: sajosij
    sajos+N+Pl+Acc: sajosijd
    sajos+N+Pl+Ill: sajosáid
    sajos+N+Pl+Loc: sajosijn
    sajos+N+Pl+Com: sajosijguin
    sajos+N+Pl+Abe: sajosijttáá

  Noun - almos: # MLO, ok; this is an adjective
    almos+N+Sg+Nom: almos             
    almos+N+Sg+Gen: almoos
    almos+N+Sg+Acc: almoos
    almos+N+Sg+Ill: almosân
    almos+N+Sg+Loc: almosist
    almos+N+Sg+Com: almosáin
    almos+N+Sg+Abe: almoosttáá
    almos+N+Ess: almosin                
    almos+N+Par: almosid                
    almos+N+Pl+Nom: almoseh
    almos+N+Pl+Gen: almosij
    almos+N+Pl+Acc: almosijd
    almos+N+Pl+Ill: almosáid
    almos+N+Pl+Loc: almosijn
    almos+N+Pl+Com: almosijguin
    almos+N+Pl+Abe: almosijttáá
